Lang_Hungarian/resources/hunmorph/ocamorph/test/hu_HU.aff
SFX r Y 6
SFX r 0 nénk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX r 0 nél . <COND><PERS<2>>>  
SFX r 0 nek . <PLUR>>  
SFX r 0 nének . <COND><PLUR>>  
SFX r 0 ne . <COND>>  
SFX r 0 nétek . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX h Y 6
SFX h 0 ttetek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX h 0 ttél [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>>>  
SFX h 0 ttünk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX h 0 ttem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>>>  
SFX h 0 ttek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PLUR>>  
SFX h 0 ünk . <PERS<1>><PLUR>>  

SFX x Y 5
SFX x z dzük dz <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX x z szük sz <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX x 0 sük s <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX x 0 jük [^sz] <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX x 0 zük [^ds]z <PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  

SFX B Y 174
SFX B 0 jél [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 jjem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B t sem fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sem [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B t ssem [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B z dzem dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B z szem sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B zt szem szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sem s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 sek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 jek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 zenek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jen j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 sen s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 jük [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jen [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 jjed [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 jed [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B t sed fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 sed [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B t ssed [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B z dzed dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B z szed sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B zt szed szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 sed s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 ze [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zétek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 jjetek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B t setek fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 setek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B t ssetek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B z dzetek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B z szetek sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B zt szetek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jjenek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B t senek fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 senek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B t ssenek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B z dzenek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B z szenek sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B zt szenek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jenek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 senek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 je [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zen [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 dd [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B t d fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B t sd [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B z zd dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B z zd sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B zt zd szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 d s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jék [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B 0 jjek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 jék j <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B 0 sék s <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B t sek fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 sek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B t ssek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B z dzek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B z szek sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B zt szek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>>>  
SFX B 0 sék s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jjen [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B t sen fest <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 sen [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B t ssen [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B z dzen dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B z szen sz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B zt szen szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>  
SFX B 0 zék [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B 0 jél j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 sél s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 zed [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 jétek [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zünk [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 zem [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jed [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>long form  
SFX B 0 jj [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B t s fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B 0 s [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B t ss [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B z dz dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B z sz sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B zt sz szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B 0 jjünk [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 j j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B 0 s s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B t sünk fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 sünk [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B t ssünk [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B z dzünk dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B z szünk sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B zt szünk szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jünk j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 sünk s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jem [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jjék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B t sék fest <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B 0 sék [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B t ssék [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B z dzék dz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B z szék sz <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B zt szék szt <SUBJUNC-IMP>>formal  
SFX B 0 jetek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jjék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jék [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t sék fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sék [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t ssék [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z dzék dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z szék sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B zt szék szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zük [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zék [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jje [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 je [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B t se fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 se [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B t sse [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B z dze dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B z sze sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B zt sze szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 se s <SUBJUNC-IMP><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jünk [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 d [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zelek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B 0 j [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B 0 jék [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 zetek [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 d [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jjél [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 zél [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B t sél fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 sél [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B t ssél [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 jelek [^aáeéiíoóöõuúüûszt] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B z dzél dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B z szél sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B zt szél szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>long form  
SFX B 0 jjük [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jük [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t sük fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sük [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t ssük [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z dzük dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z szük sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B zt szük szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sük s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jetek j <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 setek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX B 0 jjelek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B 0 jelek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B t selek fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B 0 selek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B t sselek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B z dzelek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B z szelek sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B zt szelek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B 0 jjétek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 jétek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t sétek fest <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 sétek [bcdfghjklmnpqrtvwxyéí]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B t ssétek [aeioöuü]t <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z dzétek dz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B z szétek sz <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B zt szétek szt <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 selek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX B 0 sétek s <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX B 0 z [^sd]z <SUBJUNC-IMP><PERS<2>>>short form  
SFX B 0 jenek [^sztj] <SUBJUNC-IMP><PLUR>>  

SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 ik . >  

SFX y Y 10
SFX y 0 lek [^l]. <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX y 0 nélek . <COND><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX y 0 néd . <COND><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX y 0 nék . <COND><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX y 0 nénk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX y 0 nõk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>formal  
SFX y 0 nétek . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX y 0 lek l[^l] <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX y 0 né . <COND><DEF>>  
SFX y 0 ném . <COND><PERS<1>><DEF>>  

SFX u Y 1
SFX u 0 0 . >  

SFX m Y 10
SFX m 0 i . <DEF>>  
SFX m 0 ttétek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 tted [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 ttem [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 ttelek [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX m 0 ttük [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 tték [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 itek . <PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 ik . <PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX m 0 tte [aáeéiíoóöõuúüû] <PAST><DEF>>  

SFX L Y 7
SFX L 0 etted . <PAST><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX L 0 ettétek . <PAST><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX L 0 ette . <PAST><DEF>>  
SFX L 0 ettelek . <PAST><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX L 0 ették . <PAST><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX L 0 ettük . <PAST><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX L 0 ettem . <PAST><PERS<1>><DEF>>  

SFX F Y 2
SFX F 0 ed . <PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX F 0 em . <PERS<1>><DEF>>  

SFX A Y 10
SFX A 0 enõk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>formal  
SFX A 0 ené . <COND><DEF>>  
SFX A 0 enéd . <COND><PERS<2>><DEF>>  
SFX A 0 eném . <COND><PERS<1>><DEF>>  
SFX A 0 enénk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX A 0 elek . <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX A 0 enélek . <COND><PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX A 0 enék . <COND><PLUR><DEF>>  
SFX A 0 ek ll <PERS<1<OBJ<2>>>>>  
SFX A 0 enétek . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR><DEF>>  

SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ek . <PERS<1>>>  

SFX t Y 1
SFX t 0 tek . <PERS<2>><PLUR>>  

SFX e Y 8
SFX e 0 enék . <COND><PERS<1>>>  
SFX e 0 enének . <COND><PLUR>>  
SFX e 0 ene . <COND>>  
SFX e 0 enél . <COND><PERS<2>>>  
SFX e 0 enénk . <COND><PERS<1>><PLUR>>  
SFX e 0 enek . <PLUR>>  
SFX e 0 enétek . <COND><PERS<2>><PLUR>>  
SFX e 0 esz [^sz] <PERS<2>>>  
